Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1582
Byproduct material, defined.

Byproduct material shall mean (1) any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in or made radioactive by exposure to the radiation incident to the process of producing or utilizing special nuclear material and (2) the tailings or wastes produced by the extraction or concentration of uranium or thorium from any ore processed primarily for its source material content.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 5.